District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0420.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act
may be cited as the “Student Identification Card Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Student identification card issuance.
(a) By January 5, 2026, the Mayor shall ensure that each local education agency issues a
student identification card to each student enrolled in a middle school or high school. The student
identification card shall display at least the following information:
(1) The school’s name;
(2) The school year;
(3) A student’s name; and,
(4) A photo of the student.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).

Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor,
action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review as provided
in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87
Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).